Louisiana, session 2026, SB489.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 32:863.2(A)(1), (2), (3), (4) and (6), (B), (C), (E)(1) and (2), (F)(1),
(2), (4), (5), and (6) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 32:863.2(F)(7) is hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§863.2. Notification of the cancellation or issuance of security; penalties; database
development
A.(1) All entities providing security in compliance with R.S. 32:861 et seq.,
hereinafter referred to as "security providers", whether admitted or nonadmitted
(surplus line underwriter) insurance companies providing automobile liability
policies, or sales representatives or agents of surety companies issuing motor vehicle
liability bonds, or the state treasurer holding deposits, shall notify the secretary
commissioner of the effective dates of each liability policy, liability bond, deposit,
or other security within fifteen business days from the date that notice of such policy,
bond, deposit, or other security was issued by the security provider.
(2) Except as otherwise provided for motor carriers in R.S. 32:900(M), in
addition, all such security providers shall notify the secretary commissioner when
any policy, bond, deposit, or other item of security is terminated, withdrawn,
canceled, lapsed, or otherwise made ineffective within fifteen business days from the
date that notice of the security becoming ineffective was issued by the security
provider.
(3) Beginning January 1, 1990, the information required by this Section shall
Page 1 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 489 ENROLLED
be in the form required by the secretary commissioner, who may require by
regulation such information as the driver's license number of the owner or lessee of
the vehicle and of the named insureds, together with the complete vehicle
identification number and a description of each vehicle.
(4) The information required by this Section shall be in the form required by
the secretary commissioner, who may require by regulation such information as the
driver's license number of the owner or lessee of the vehicle and of the named
insureds, together with the complete vehicle identification number and description
of each vehicle.
* * *
(6) If any cancellation of a motor vehicle liability insurance policy occurs as
a result of the rescission or other cancellation of the sale of the motor vehicle on
which the policy is issued, the insurer shall notify the secretary commissioner of the
cancellation and the circumstances of the cancellation, and the insured shall not be
liable for any penalty or fee imposed for failure to maintain the security required by
law.
B. When a security provider does not provide the deputy secretary of public
safety services of the Department of Public Safety and Corrections with the
information required by this Section within the time limits set forth in this Section,
the insurance company, sales representative or agent, state treasurer, or other
provider shall pay a late fee of not more than fifty dollars per policy, bond, or
deposit, or other security item concerning which information is not supplied. If the
security provider has reported this information for a policy, bond, deposit, or other
security item for a commercial motor vehicle in an untimely manner, the deputy
secretary commissioner shall impose the late fee unless the deputy secretary
determines that the security provider made a good faith effort to comply with these
requirements but the delay was caused by circumstances outside the security
provider's control. All fees collected under this Subsection shall be deposited in the
Bond Security and Redemption Fund as provided in R.S. 32:853(B)(2).
C. The secretary commissioner shall keep a record of the information
Page 2 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 489 ENROLLED
received from security providers concerning coverage of vehicles and persons by
security required by R.S. 32:861, which information may be stored through
automated electronic data processing means. After the department has complete
vehicle liability security records, upon written request including the driver's license
number for each person, the vehicle identification number for each vehicle, and the
payment of a fee of fifteen dollars for each vehicle owned by a person about which
inquiry is made, the secretary commissioner shall forward to the inquiring party
such vehicle and driver liability security information as is contained in the records
of the department. If the department's search of its records fails to show the existence
of any liability insurance or other security as of the date about which inquiry is made,
an official of the department will issue a sworn, notarized affidavit to that effect.
Such an affidavit shall be prima facie evidence that on the date in question, the
person or vehicle about which inquiry was made did not have in effect a policy of
liability insurance or other security as required by law. The fee collected pursuant
to this Section shall be remitted by the secretary commissioner to the state treasurer
to be credited to the Bond Security and Redemption Fund as provided in R.S.
32:853(B)(2).
* * *
E.(1) Prior to taking any administrative action based on the receipt of a notice
of cancellation of insurance or other security, the secretary commissioner shall
notify the person who is the subject of the notice at his last known driver's license
address, of cancellation of the receipt of that notice. The notice of receipt of a notice
of cancellation shall be in writing. The notice shall inform the subject that he has ten
calendar days from the date of the notice in which he may surrender the license
plates of the vehicle in order to avoid the fees prescribed by R.S. 32:863(A)(3)(a).
The person to whom the notice is addressed shall have thirty days to respond to the
notice. The response may be made by mail.
(2) If the person to whom the notice is addressed is able to show that the
insurance or other security was canceled for a legitimate reason, the secretary
commissioner shall take no administrative action against that person. Legitimate
Page 3 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 489 ENROLLED
reasons for cancellation of insurance or other security shall include but shall not be
limited to the transfer of ownership of the vehicle or the surrender of the license plate
of the formerly insured vehicle. If the vehicle is sold within ten calendar days after
the date liability security on the vehicle was cancelled or its license plate is
surrendered within ten calendar days of the date of notice sent pursuant to Paragraph
(1) of this Subsection, no administrative action shall be taken. The transfer of
ownership of the vehicle may be established by presenting to the secretary
commissioner a copy of the title transfer or a copy of the act of sale, donation,
exchange, surrender to a salvage yard, or other transaction.
* * *
F.(1) The secretary commissioner shall formulate criteria to develop and
initiate a request for proposals to procure and implement a real-time system to
quickly and accurately identify and verify the existence of motor vehicle insurance
or other security required in compliance with the Motor Vehicle Safety
Responsibility Law using advanced telecommunications and computer technology.
(2) The criteria established by the secretary commissioner shall be developed
only after consulting with an advisory group consisting of the commissioner of
insurance or his designee, the superintendent of state police or his designee, the
executive director of the Louisiana Highway Safety Commission or his designee, and
five additional members, one representing the American Insurance Association, one
representing the Property Casualty Insurance Association of America, one selected
from a list of names submitted by the three insurers with the largest market share of
automobile insurance in Louisiana, one from the Louisiana Association of Fire and
Casualty Companies, and one from the Louisiana Independent Agents Association.
* * *
(4) The system developed pursuant to this Subsection may initially be
implemented by the secretary commissioner as a six-month pilot program to be
developed and implemented statewide upon expiration of the six-month period.
(5)(a) The commissioner may authorize a third party vendor or
designated agent to conduct a motor vehicle registration plate inquiry at the
Page 4 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 489 ENROLLED
request of law enforcement through the state insurance verification system. The
authorization to conduct the plate inquiry shall be solely for the purpose of
verifying compliance with motor vehicle liability insurance requirements as
needed by law enforcement agencies.
(b) Any violation of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph by a local
government entity or law enforcement agency that requested and received
authorization from the commissioner shall constitute malfeasance in office
pursuant to R. S. 14:134, and may be used as grounds to initiate civil claims
pursuant to the Louisiana Governmental Claims Act, R.S. 13:5101, et seq.
(6) The secretary commissioner shall require such information as may be
necessary from automobile insurers or their representatives and the state treasurer as
is needed to assist the contractor in developing the system as such relates to the
cancellation or issuance of motor vehicle liability security or deposit of sufficient
security with the state treasurer in order to operate a motor vehicle in this state.
(6) (7) The secretary commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations
in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions
of this Subsection.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.